Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 1a.
(1) In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $198,000,000, to be allocated to state agencies for state employee
compensation changes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 1b.
(1) In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, to be allocated to  state agencies for compensation
changes driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 1c. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), collected or  received by the Department of Human Services,
for aging and people with disabilities programs,  is increased by $1,813,619, for transfer of the
Senior Health Insurance Benefits Assistance program from the Department of Consumer and
Business Services.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 1
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services, is increased by $262,227, for implementation of
a VoIP communications system in 10 state prisons.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative  services, is increased by $1,034,567, for the cost of bond
issuance.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service, is in-
creased by $10,386,522.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $700,870
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Cor-
rections, for debt service.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for oper-
ations and health services, is increased by $13,400,000, for implementation of  an electronic
health records system.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$8,658,704 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Corrections from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Corrections, for  information
technology projects and equipment purchases.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by
$650,000, for the Family Preservation Project operated by the YWCA of Greater Portland.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for the General
Counsel Division, is increased by $447,784, for the Fair Housing Enforcement initiative.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5014), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for defense of criminal convictions,
is increased by $1,649,318, for forecasted caseload expenses.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  crime victim and survivor ser-
vices, is increased by $218,003, for appellate advocacy.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 2
House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for the Criminal Justice Division,
is increased by $214,439, for internet crimes against children  investigations and prosecutions.
SECTION 13. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $5,000,000, for crime victim and survivor services, to assist
victims of domestic violence and sexual assault with housing needs.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the  Oregon Military Department, for operations, is increased by $274,160, for the cost of
bond issuance.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the Oregon Military Department,  for emergency management, is increased by $210,000, for
the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (5),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $2,151,329.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or  received
by the Oregon Military Department, for emergency management, is  increased by $10,000,000,
for recapitalization of the State  Preparedness and Incident Response Equipment Grant Pro-
gram.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, for admin-
istrative services, agency support and criminal justice information services, is  increased by
$1,429,311, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 19. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Police, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,674,818, for debt service.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,739,772 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Police  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Department of State Police, for deferred main-
tenance, capital project costs and safety improvements.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 3
SECTION 21.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Youth Authority, for facility
programs, is increased by $1,158,492, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Youth Authority, for program
support, is increased by $113,469, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth  Authority by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (En-
rolled House Bill 5039), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service, is increased
by $4,482,262.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Youth Authority, for program
support, is increased  by $7,756,351, for the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade
project.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,448,068 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Youth Authority  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Oregon Youth Authority, for capital improve-
ments and the Juvenile Justice Information System upgrade project.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, for judicial compensation, is in-
creased by $721,500, to support the two circuit court judge positions established by  the
amendments to ORS 3.012 by section 8, chapter __, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled House Bill
3011).
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations, is increased by
$867,280, for administrative support for the two circuit court  judge positions established by
the amendments to ORS 3.012 by section 8,  chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House
Bill 3011).
SECTION 28.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 303, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Public Defense Services Commission,  for professional
services, is increased by $92,721, for expenditure of Coronavirus Relief Fund moneys  received
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred  to the Public Defense
Service Commission for professional services related to public defense due  to increasing
needs resulting from the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 4
5510), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, for the health insurance  marketplace, is decreased by $1,813,619, for the Senior Health
Insurance Benefits Assistance Program.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  145, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5536), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Public Employees  Retirement System for the Employer Incentive Fund, is in-
creased by $16,792,238, for state matching funds.
NOTE: Sections 31 through 33 were deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 34. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to be allocated to  state agencies for family treat-
ment court programs.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 35. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, to be allocated for the implementation of pretrial
release under chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 48).
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 36.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount of $330
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds, collected  or received
by the Department of Education, for debt service.
SECTION 37.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the State  School Fund, is de-
creased by $27,849,006.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  Senate Bill 5514),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to
the Department of Education for the State School Fund, is increased by $219,059,876.
NOTE: Section 39 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Department  of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscella-
neous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the
department for  the State School Fund from the Fund for Student Success established under
ORS 327.001, is increased by $8,789,130.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$125,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from proceeds of Article XI-P bonds and  other revenues, including
Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Education, for matching grants made  to
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 5
school districts for construction or improvement to school  facilities through the Oregon
School Capital Improvement Matching Program.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$17,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Education, for broadband Connecting Oregon Schools grants.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5  (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5513), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses  described in sections 6 and 14, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5513), from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate  activity tax funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of Education, for operations, is increased  by $1,459,142
for costs of issuance of general obligation bonds and lottery bonds.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Department of Education by section 4, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5513), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service on general obli-
gation bonds, is increased by  $666,308 for debt service for projects at the Oregon School for
the Deaf.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter __, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for public
university statewide programs, is decreased by $103,420,570, for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter __, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for statewide
public services, is increased by $103,420,570, for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from American  Rescue Plan
Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services and transferred to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission
for the following purposes:
(1) $636,812, for distribution to Umpqua Community  College for land movement
reparation.
(2) $3,500,000, for distribution to  Southern Oregon University for the demolition of Cas-
cades Hall.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for statewide
public services, is increased by $150,000 for the North Willamette Research  and Extension
Center’s berry research initiative.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (8), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $427,083 for costs related to  avian deaths and
energy facilities.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$530,575 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Higher Education
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 6
Coordinating Commission, for debt  service on general obligation bonds issued on behalf of
community colleges.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10)(a), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
debt service on outstanding general obligation sold for the  benefit of Oregon public univer-
sities, is increased by $773,239.
SECTION 52.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $867,805, for debt service on general obli-
gation bonds sold for the Financial Assistance Management Information System.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter __, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 8  to 12, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5528), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for programs and related grants, is increased by $7,003,106  for costs of bonds
issuance.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-Q of the
Oregon Constitution, collected or received by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion, for the Financial Assistance Management Information System.
SECTION 55. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,269,000, for  the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division,
for the Oregon Crime Victims Law Center.
SECTION 56. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for the Office of the Attorney  General and admin-
istration, for bias crimes response.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$250,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for the cost  of issuing general obligation bonds for the
Supreme Court building renovation.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$20,730,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund  for the project costs of, and cost of issuing general obli-
gation bonds for, the Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$20,383,129 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for local matching  funds for the Benton County Court-
house.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of
expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Construction and
Improvement Fund for the project costs of, and cost of issuing general obligation bonds for,
the Clackamas County Courthouse.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 7
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1  is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by the Judicial Department from the Oregon  Courthouse Capital Construction and
Improvement Fund for local matching funds for the Clackamas County Courthouse.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,885,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for the project costs of, and cost of  issuing general obli-
gation bonds for, the Crook County Courthouse.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,700,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for local matching funds for  the Crook County Courthouse.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$16,110,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund  for the project costs of, and cost of issuing general obli-
gation bonds for, the Linn County Courthouse.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$15,900,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for local matching funds for the Linn County Courthouse.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$169,827 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Judicial Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Judicial Department, for planning and costs
associated with replacement of the Crook County Courthouse.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department from  American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Judicial Department, for planning and  costs
associated with replacement of the Curry County Courthouse.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the  Judicial Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to  the Judicial Department, for the Supreme Court
building renovation.
SECTION 69. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Grants for riparian and
upland restoration and
protection of water quality ....... $ 10,750,000
(2) Grants for floodplain
restoration and reconnection .... $ 5,000,000
(3) Grant to Eugene Water and
Electric Board for
restoration and targeted
acquisition of high-priority
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 8
McKenzie riparian/floodplain
properties.................................. $ 4,000,000
(4) Operational and
administrative costs.................. $ 670,000
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (12),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for Oregon Department of Administrative
Services debt service, is increased by $7,884,472.
SECTION 71.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill  5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise asset management, is  in-
creased by $1,800,000 for bond issuance costs associated with bonds issued under Article XI-Q
of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 72.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (15),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for special governmental payments, is in-
creased by $6,394,311.
SECTION 73.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5002),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services from  lottery moneys allocated from the
Administrative Services Economic Development  Fund for debt service and related costs for
bonds issued in previous biennia, is increased by $4,615,761.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$240,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the purpose of allocating  $4,000,000 to each
member of  the Senate and $2,000,000 to each member of the House of Representatives to
provide grants to respond to  the COVID-19 public health emergency and its economic im-
pacts.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$120,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Capital Projects Fund moneys received by the Oregon  Department of Ad-
ministrative Services, for the purpose  of transfer to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for deposit in the Broadband Fund established by section 4, chapter 17,  Oregon
Laws 2020 (first special session).
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,950,127,815 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  as the maximum limit
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 9
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services from Ameri-
can Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for expenditures and activities to respond to the
COVID-19 public health emergency and its economic impacts.
SECTION 77.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, for the second phase  of the Facility for Agricultural
Resource Management project.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (4), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the
Oregon Historical Society, is increased by $1,500,000.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for
court appointed special advocates, is  increased by $2,779,673 for the CASA Volunteer Pro-
gram.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
court appointed special advocates, is increased by $250,000 to be distributed  to the Oregon
CASA Network to create and implement a statewide distance training and learning  program
for the CASA Volunteer Program.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$65,476,928 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services from
Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act Coronavirus Relief Fund  moneys re-
ceived by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for expenditures and activities
to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency and its economic impacts.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the
Chief Operating Office, is increased by $3,765,271  for a disparity study to improve state pro-
curement practices.
NOTE:
 Section 83 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 84. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Fair Housing Council of
Oregon for a collaborative
housing partnership.................. $ 2,500,000
(2) Oregon Law Center for
legal help related to housing
issues ........................................ $ 1,000,000
(3) Mid-Columbia Community
Action Council for a
navigation center ...................... $ 1,500,000
(4) Special Olympics Oregon for
a sports training and
athletic competition .................. $ 500,000 
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 10
(5) Friends of Tryon Creek State
Park for park improvements .... $ 250,000
(6) Multnomah County School
District for Reynolds High
School Health Center ................ $ 2,302,052
(7) Umatilla County Jail for
expansion/mental health
facility....................................... $ 1,785,000
(8) City of Spray for
EMS Complex ............................ $ 280,000
(9) Illinois Valley Wellness
Resources for Illinois Valley
Shelter and Resource Center .... $ 630,000
(10) Council on Aging of Central
Oregon for Central Oregon
Senior Services Center
renovation................................. $ 250,000
(11) City of Depoe Bay for
restoration of pilings and
docks......................................... $ 1,885,178
(12) City of John Day for Kam Wah
Chung Interpretive Center........ $ 1,000,000
(13) Harney County for
communication upgrade............ $ 1,546,000
(14) Grant County for
public safety network ............... $ 650,000
(15) Project DOVE for transitional
units updates ............................ $ 200,000
(16) Sheridan School District for
CTEC West ............................... $ 1,900,000
(17) High Desert Rangeland Fire
Protection Association for
Lake County wildland fire
needs......................................... $ 500,000
(18) Bowman Museum for
exhibits center .......................... $ 150,000
(19) Creating Housing Coalition
for Hub City Village .................. $ 600,000
(20) Vietnam War Memorial Fund for
Vietnam War Memorial on the
Oregon State Capitol grounds ... $ 400,000
(21) City of Mosier for Mosier
Center ....................................... $ 750,000
(22) Oregon Humane Society for
New Road Ahead Animal Crimes
Forensic Center ........................ $ 520,000
(23) McKenzie Valley Wellness for
McKenzie Valley Health Clinic
replacement .............................. $ 1,800,000
(24) Bend-Redmond Habitat for
Humanity for Quince Townhome
project....................................... $ 1,600,000
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 11
(25) City of Turner for Ball
Brothers seismic upgrade ......... $ 500,000
(26) The Trust for Public Land
for Butte Falls Community
Forest project ........................... $ 700,000
(27) Blue River Community Library
for rebuild project ..................... $ 1,400,000
(28) McKenzie Fire and Rescue for
Disaster Relief Logistics
Center ....................................... $ 903,520
(29) United Way of Jackson
County for affordable
home ownership ........................ $ 200,000
(30) Community Counseling
Solutions for Boardman
Regional PRTS/subacute
children’s facility ...................... $ 1,400,000
(31) City of Umatilla for Minority
Entrepreneurial Development
and Business Center ................. $ 1,800,000
(32) Molalla Rural Fire Protection
District for wildland fire
protection.................................. $ 385,000
(33) Upper McKenzie Rural Fire
Protection District for
facility and equipment
replacement .............................. $ 2,100,000
(34) City of Salem for a turnkey
project....................................... $ 800,000
(35) City of Salem for police
body cameras ............................ $ 816,000
(36) City of Salem for a housing
assistance voucher program ..... $ 1,000,000
(37) City of Salem for shelters ......... $ 10,500,000
(38) Multnomah County for the
Arbor Lodge Shelter ................. $ 5,000,000
(39) Cherriots to offset expiring
tax credits ................................. $ 5,928,184
(40) Yamhill County Transit to
offset expiring tax credits ......... $ 718,079
(41) Columbia County Rider
Transportation to offset
expiring tax credits ................... $ 288,451
(42) Lebanon Transportation to
offset expiring tax credits ......... $ 44,975
(43) Jackson County Fire District
for firefighter apprentices ........ $ 2,000,000
(44) Clackamas Fire District for
firefighter apprentices .............. $ 2,000,000
(45) Eugene Springfield Fire
Department for firefighter
apprentices................................ $ 2,000,000
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 12
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon  Department
of Administrative Services,  for the provision of grants to the following entities for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Center for Hope and Safety
for Hope Plaza .......................... $ 7,626,692
(2) City of Gresham for Gradin
Community Sports Park ........... $ 2,044,943
(3) Eugene Family YMCA Facility .. $ 15,211,079
(4) Jefferson County for Jefferson
County Health and Wellness
Center ....................................... $ 5,510,987
(5) Oregon Coast Aquarium ........... $ 5,106,840
(6) Parrott Creek Child and
Family Services for building
renovation................................. $ 3,552,061
(7) Port of Cascade Locks for
business park expansion ........... $ 2,445,033
(8) Klamath County for Klamath
Crimson Rose ............................ $ 12,194,093
(9) Latino Network for La Plaza
Esperanza.................................. $ 4,056,571
(10) Willamette ESD for Willamette
Career Academy ........................ $ 7,040,791
(11) City of Eugene for Downtown
Riverfront Park development ... $ 5,107,713
(12) Woodburn Community Center .. $ 15,210,747
(13) Rogue River School District
for Rogue River Wimer
Wellness Center ........................ $ 3,048,464
(14) East Lincoln County Fire and
Rescue for Eddyville Fire Hall .. $ 4,056,571
(15) Greater Toledo Aquatic and
Community Center .................... $ 3,048,464
(16) Multnomah County for
behavioral health resource
center........................................ $ 10,177,681
(17) City of North Plains for
public works/emergency
operations center ...................... $ 5,107,713
(18) City of John Day for Central
Grant County Aquatics Center . $ 2,042,509
(19) Family Justice Center of
Washington County for Family
Peace Center ............................. $ 6,367,073
(20) Corvallis Homeless Shelter
Coalition for Project Turnkey
Corvallis (PSH housing
project)...................................... $ 5,107,713
(21) Wasco County for Columbia
Gorge Resolution Center ........... $ 4,563,260
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 13
(22) Port of Portland for PDX
seismically resilient runway
engineering design .................... $ 4,056,571
(23) Willamette Falls Locks and
Canal......................................... $ 7,373,441
(24) City of Phoenix for public
safety building........................... $ 13,804,536
(25) Mid-Willamette Family YMCA
for Multipurpose sports field
complex..................................... $ 4,639,489
(26) Serendipity Center for Believe
In Me Campus Expansion ......... $ 2,849,500
(27) OMSI District for new Water
Avenue ...................................... $ 5,107,713
(28) City of Lincoln City for
D River welcome center ........... $ 2,546,796
(29) Port of Morrow for workforce
center........................................ $ 4,359,110
(30) City of Redmond for public
safety/mental health triage
center........................................ $ 3,048,464
SECTION 86.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5538), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the Elections Division, is  in-
creased by $2,474,287 for a county elections infrastructure.
SECTION 87. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of  Geology and Mineral Industries by section 1, chapter 5,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
operations of the department, is increased by $328,710.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 5, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and federal funds for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 5, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5010), collected or received by the State
Department of Geology and Mineral Industries, for geologic survey, is  decreased by $173,464.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section  3, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5010),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter 5,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5010), collected or received by the State Department  of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, is decreased by $155,246.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (2), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  food safety, is in-
creased by $200,000, for the predator control program.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (3), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for natural resources, is
increased by $2,301,685, for  agriculture water quality and the plant protection and conserva-
tion program.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 14
SECTION 92. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the  General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Improving People’s
Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and Services Account  established by ORS
430.233.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission from the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and  Services Account established
by ORS 430.233, for making grants to counties and federally recognized Indian tribes for
community supports and services for individuals with mental health or substance abuse  dis-
orders leading to their involvement with the criminal justice system.
SECTION 94.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5005), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by
$500,000, for the Legal Services  Pilot Program at the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility op-
erated by the Oregon Justice Resource Center.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$49,173,337 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of  Corrections from Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and
Economic Security Act Coronavirus Relief  Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services and transferred to the Department  of Corrections, for the pur-
pose of expenditures and activities to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations and health
services, is decreased by $49,173,337.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,201,239 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Public Safety Standards  and Training from
American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred to the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, for deferred maintenance projects.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department  by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations, is in-
creased by $6,720,919, for deferred maintenance projects.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, other than those  described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), collected or received by the Oregon Military  Department, for
operations, is increased by $6,720,919, for deferred maintenance projects.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for community programs,
is increased by $574,510, for providers of behavioral health services that include sex  offense
treatment services.
SECTION 101.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section  1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5039), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, for juvenile crime
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 15
prevention/diversion, is increased by  $1,841,868, to reimburse counties for the cost of
expunging certain juvenile records.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill  5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for facility programs, is
increased by $801,378, to offset the elimination of fees, fines and court costs associated  with
juvenile delinquency matters.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for central services,
is increased by $76,488,018, for feeding and sheltering of wildfire survivors.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $5,810,000, for anti-hunger programs.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$14,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to  the Department of Human Services, for emergency
food supply stabilization.
SECTION 106. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for  the Crime Victim and Survivor Services Division,
for child abuse intervention centers.
SECTION 107. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Rooftop Solar Incentive
Fund established by section 3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department  of Energy for the solar rebate program from
the Rooftop Solar Incentive Fund established by section 3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Department of Energy is increased
by $247,974, for a study on small scale renewable energy projects.
SECTION 110.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund,  the amount of $3,500,000, for debt service for the Small Scale Local Energy
Project Loan Program.
SECTION 111. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $10,831,296, for a grant program  to incentivize energy effi-
cient rebuilding after the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 112. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $350,000, to begin initial scoping and  design of a da-
tabase framework of water and infrastructure data.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 16
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill  5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for water
quality, is increased by $420,099, to backfill a revenue shortfall in the program.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$15,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Environmental Quality from American Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and transferred to the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity, for providing financial assistance to public  agencies or qualified institutions for the
repair, replacement, upgrade or evaluation of residential or other on-site septic systems.
SECTION 115.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, for water
quality, is increased by $569,382, for administration of financial assistance for on-site septic
systems.
SECTION 116.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for hazardous waste and  structural debris
cleanup cost sharing related to the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $395,030.
SECTION 118.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5516),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, the pro-
ceeds of bonds for the Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation and
air quality grants, drinking water protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants
and for smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds
not described in  section 2 , chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), col-
lected or received by the Department of Environmental Quality,  for land quality, is increased
by $4,300,000, for project  costs and for the cost of issuing bonds for orphan site cleanup
projects.
SECTION 119.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the pro-
ceeds of bonds for the Orphan Site Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation and
air quality grants, drinking water protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove grants
and for smoke  monitoring laboratory services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5516), col-
lected or received  by the Department of Environmental Quality, for debt service, is de-
creased by $300,000.
SECTION 120.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $545,000, for deposit into the Oregon  Conservation
and Recreation Fund established by section 1 (1), chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5009), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 17
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from the Pacific  Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5009), collected or received by the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the Wildlife
Division, is increased by $1,090,000 for the conservation and recreation program.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5009), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, for the Wildlife
Division, is increased by $200,000, for the predator control program.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5009),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $446,579.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$105,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife, for bond issuance costs associated with bonds issued  under Article XI-Q
of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife from American Rescue
Plan Act Coronavirus  State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services and  transferred to the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, for fish screens and fish passage projects.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$4,245,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for
core systems replacement, for the purposes of implementing the Electronic Valuation In-
formation System (ELVIS).
SECTION 127.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5537), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service and re-
lated costs, is increased by $672,270, for the  purposes of implementing the Electronic Valu-
ation Information System (ELVIS).
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5537), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is increased by $397,011, for implementing  provisions of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2433).
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5537), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is increased by  $438,569, for implementing provisions of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 727).
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5537), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is increased by $161,387, for implementing  provisions of chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 139).
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 18
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (1),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5537), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for administration, is
increased by $292,002, for administrative support.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medi-
care receipts and including federal funds  for indirect cost recovery, Social Security Supple-
mental Security Income recoveries and the Child  Care and Development Fund, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for
aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by  $99,503, for staffing the Senior
Emergency Medical Services Innovation Program.
SECTION 133.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5009), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the Habitat
Division, is increased by $585,056 for the Western Oregon Stream Restoration Program.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5530), for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, for the planning program, is increased by $205,418 for grant coordination.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (2),
chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill  5530), for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, for grant programs, is increased by $2,000,000 to expend on grants to local govern-
ments for planning and  capacity-building relating to the assessment of housing need and in-
creasing housing supply and choice.
SECTION 136. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5530), for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, for the planning  program, is increased by $1,306,912 to study and make legislative
recommendations on the  incorporation of a regional housing needs analysis into state and
local planning programs.
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section 1, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5531), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by $50,000
for an electronic filing and case management system.
SECTION 138.
 Section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  Senate Bill 5544), is
amended to read:
Sec. 2.  For the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, expenditures by the State Treasurer for un-
claimed property investment-related transactions and  finders fees are not limited.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office by section 1,  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5501), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased
by $228,372, for staffing community and stakeholder engagement efforts.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,310,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee, for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds and project costs
for the Document Publishing and Management System.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 19
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5016),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $663,587.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5007), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appro-
priated to the Employment Department by sections 3 and 4, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5007), but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds other than those
described in section 3,  chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5007), collected
or received by the Employment Department, for  unemployment insurance, shared services
and workforce operations, and workforce and economic research, is increased by $872,278, for
administration of unemployment insurance benefits.
SECTION 143.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,113,208 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, for Salem Y Veterans Housing to construct the Veterans’ Affordable
Housing project financed through the issuance of lottery bonds, and associated costs of is-
suance.
SECTION 144.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$499,184 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs for debt service related  to
the Veterans’ Affordable Housing project.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5036), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund  established under ORS
406.140 to the Department of Veterans’  Affairs, for services provided by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, is increased  by $175,000, for the Veteran Educational Bridge Grant Pro-
gram established by section 1, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Department of Transportation  from lottery moneys allocated from the Veterans’
Services Fund established under ORS 406.140 to the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs and
transferred to the Department of Transportation for veteran transit  services, is increased
by $650,000.
SECTION 147. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for graffiti and litter removal along  state
highways and interstates.
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund Appropri-
ation made to the Department of Transportation by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  expenses related
to debris removal associated with the 2020 wildfire season, is increased by $1,250,000 for cul-
tural resources assessments in  advance of wildfire related debris removal and recovery
actions.
SECTION 149.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 20
Bill 5542),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds received as reimbursement from the United States  Department of Transportation, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5542), collected or received by the Department of Transpor-
tation, is increased by the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Tualatin Hills Park and
Recreation for Fanno Creek
Trail improvements................... $ 2,145,358
(2) City of Sherwood for a
pedestrian bridge ...................... $ 4,057,570
SECTION 150.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$298,451 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Department of Transportation from the State Board of Towing
Account established by section 6, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 300),
to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 11, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled
Senate Bill 300).
SECTION 151. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses by the Department of Transportation from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Transportation, for the  following
purposes:
(1) Port of Hood River for
replacement of the Hood
River-White Salmon
Interstate Bridge ...................... $ 5,000,000
(2) Lake County for
rehabilitation of the
Lake County Railroad ............... $ 3,349,960
(3) Clackamas County for
Sunrise Gateway Corridor
planning.................................... $ 4,000,000
SECTION 152.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Transportation from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Transportation, for the  following
transportation infrastructure projects:
(1) Oregon 213/82nd Avenue
safety improvements ................. $ 80,000,000
(2) Newberg Dundee Bypass,
Phase II (OR-219 section) ......... $ 32,000,000
SECTION 153.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for distribution to the
Northwest Health Foundation Fund II for researching ways to ensure equitable outcomes in
public safety, educating impacted communities about the  current public safety system and
providing a community-driven  process to produce recommendations to the Legislative As-
sembly for public safety reform.
SECTION 154.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 21
General Fund, the amount of $23,200,000 for grants to counties  for the reimbursement of lost
tax revenue related to the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 155. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5017), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the State  Library, is increased by $2,924,165 for
the expenditure of American Rescue Plan Act funds,  for improved community access to the
Internet and to increase digital literacy.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education  by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5513), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations, is in-
creased by $500,000, for a study  of the impact of State School Fund spending on disparities
between Black, Indigenous and People of Color (BIPOC) students and non-BIPOC students.
SECTION 157. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
public university statewide programs, is increased  by $349,000, for dispute resolution pro-
grams.
SECTION 158.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
Higher Education Coordinating Commission programs, is increased by  $5,000,000, for pro-
grams assisting access to post-secondary education opportunities.
SECTION 159.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
public university statewide programs,  is increased by $1,000,000, for the Women’s Leadership
Center at Portland State University.
SECTION 160.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
public university statewide programs, is increased by $162,753, for the  Veterinary Diagnostic
Laboratory.
SECTION 161.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
statewide public services, is  increased by $236,922, for facilities maintenance at Oregon State
University.
SECTION 162.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (9), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
statewide public services, is increased by  $2,680,000, for increased wildfire smoke testing ca-
pacity and enhanced smoke research.
SECTION 163.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
public university statewide programs, is increased  by $5,500,000, for the Center of Excellence
in Applied Computing and for expanding health-related clinical and laboratory facilities at the
Oregon Institute of Technology.
SECTION 164.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the Gen-
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 22
eral Fund, the amount of $1,241,098, for operations,  for the expungement of criminal records
for marijuana infractions.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Corrections by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for community cor-
rections, is increased by $10,000,000, for  distribution to counties as reimbursement for mon-
eys no longer received from supervision fees.
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5005),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased
by $4,000,000, to award grants to public  and private entities for restorative justice programs.
SECTION 167. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $150,000,000, to be allocated for the state’s natural disaster
prevention, preparedness, response and recovery activities.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 168. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to be allocated  to the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission for a Transforming Justice initiative.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 169. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $5,130,265, to be allocated to the Department of Education and
the proposed Department of Early Learning and Care for the establishment of a new agency.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1  (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5513), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations,  is in-
creased by $3,498,673, for the development  of the staffing needs, system development and
other issues in the establishment of the proposed Department of Early Learning and Care.
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5529),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medi-
care receipts and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supple-
mental Security Income recoveries and the Child  Care and Development Fund, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5529), collected or received by the Department of Human Services, for
self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $95,000,000,  for employment-related day care ser-
vices.
SECTION 172.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1), chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 8  to 12, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 23
(Enrolled Senate  Bill 5528), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for programs and related grants, is increased by $12,900,000,  for payments out
of the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established  by section 4, chapter __, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 551).
SECTION 173. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for distribution  to the Inno-
vation Law Lab, for immigration defense.
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (5), chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House
Bill 5025),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for community  support and grants, is increased by $10,214,553, for the
expenditure of lottery bond proceeds and costs of bond issuance related  to the Oregon Main
Street program.
SECTION 175.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to  the State Parks and Recreation Department, is increased by $414,812, for the pay-
ment of debt service.
SECTION 176. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (2), chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House
Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for central services, is increased by $750,000,  for the cost of bond issuance
for capital improvement and renewal.
SECTION 177.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Parks  and Recreation Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,232,560, for the payment of debt service.
SECTION 178. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Parks  and Recreation Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $316,480, for the payment of costs associated
with the development of statewide standards for recreation projects and administrative sup-
port for the Outdoor Recreation Advisory Committee established by section 7, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2171).
SECTION 179.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the United States Forest Service for  fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State  Forestry
Department, for capital improvement, is increased by $4,820,772.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the United States Forest Service for  fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 24
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State  Forestry
Department, for agency administration, is increased by $64,229, for the costs  of issuing gen-
eral obligation bonds for capital improvements.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $260,395.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, for debt service, is increased by $255,807.
SECTION 183. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for distribution as grants to expand  tree seedling
nursery capacity and supply.
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, for agency administration,  is increased by $49,196, for the costs of issuing gen-
eral obligation bonds for replacement of the agency’s Toledo facility.
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the United States Forest Service for  fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State  Forestry
Department, for debt service, is increased by $146,257.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service, is in-
creased by $105,260.
SECTION 187. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for fire protection, is
increased by $666,937, for costs associated with support to rangeland protection associations.
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,060,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses by the Department of State Lands for distribution of grants as directed
by section  1, chapter___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 3114), from the Oregon
Ocean Science Fund established by ORS 196.567.
SECTION 189. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 25
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $160,000,000,  for the seismic rehabilitation grant
program.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $2,050,000,  for the costs of issuing general obligation
bonds for the seismic rehabilitation program.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 1 (3), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt
service, is increased by $6,371,670.
SECTION 192.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for a  municipal wildfire assistance
program.
SECTION 193. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $80,000, for distribution to Crawford Electric
for temporary power pole needs related to the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 194. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for infrastructure,  for the purpose
of making grants to the following entities for financial assistance due to the  2020 wildfire
season for building and planning departments staffing:
(1) Lane County.............................. $ 755,319
(2) Linn County .............................. $ 275,000
(3) Lincoln County.......................... $ 190,000
(4) Douglas County ......................... $ 375,000
(5) Marion County .......................... $ 975,000
(6) Jackson County......................... $ 710,000
(7) City of Talent ............................ $ 280,000
(8) City of Phoenix ......................... $ 677,755
SECTION 195. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for infrastructure,  for the purpose
of making grants to the following entities for staffing and operational needs  associated with
the 2020 wildfire season:
(1) City of Gates ............................. $ 251,000
(2) City of Detroit .......................... $ 521,000
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development  Department, from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  Oregon Business Development
Department, for infrastructure, for grants to the following entities, for the  following pur-
poses:
(1) City of Mill City - Storm
Drainage Improvements............ $ 2,923,500
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 26
(2) Hood River Waterfront
Stormwater Line ....................... $ 2,694,953
(3) City of Elgin Wastewater
Collection System ..................... $ 2,640,125
(4) City of Sandy Wastewater
Treatment Plant ....................... $ 14,700,000
(5) Marion County - North
Santiam Septic to Sewer ........... $ 50,000,000
(6) City of Turner - Water
Pipe Project .............................. $ 3,000,000
(7) City of Vale - Wastewater
Treatment Facility Headworks
Improvements ........................... $ 100,000
(8) City of Astoria - 16th St.
Distribution Waterline
Replacement.............................. $ 2,790,000
(9) City of Astoria - Pipeline
Road Waterline Resilience ........ $ 2,930,000
(10) City of Clatskanie - Waste
Water Treatment Plant ............ $ 10,000,000
(11) Lyons-Mehama Water District . $ 5,260,000
(12) Port of Toledo - Sanitary
Sewer Extension to Hwy 20 ...... $ 2,425,798
(13) City of Waldport - Water
Tank Project ............................. $ 974,850
(14) Arch Cape Domestic Water
Supply District - Arch Cape
Forest Project ........................... $ 2,000,000
(15) City of Astoria - Wastewater
Treatment Plant Headworks
Improvement Project ................ $ 4,860,000
(16) City of Echo - Water
System Improvements .............. $ 5,530,000
(17) City of Echo - Waste
Water System Improvements ... $ 1,500,000
(18) City of Aurora -
Wastewater Treatment
Plant Facility ............................ $ 10,545,543
(19) City of Aurora - Water
Storage Tank and Pump Station $ 4,284,203
(20) Crane Union School District
1J - Crane Community Water
and Sewer System ..................... $ 3,200,000
(21) City of Arlington - Columbia
River Municipal Pump Station .. $ 250,000
(22) City of Arlington - Wastewater
Facilities Plan ........................... $ 65,000
(23) City of Tillamook - Water
Transmission Line Replacement $ 12,000,000
(24) Mapleton Water District -
Infrastructure project ............... $ 1,140,000
(25) City of Lakeside - New
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 27
Wastewater Treatment Plant ... $ 14,628,685
(26) City of Scappoose - New
Headworks and Grit Chamber,
Basalt Well, 2M Gal Keys
Road Reservoir, Miller WTP
Repair, Smith Road Pump
Station ...................................... $ 10,000,000
(27) City of Aumsville - Water
System Improvements .............. $ 2,500,000
(28) City of Philomath - Water
Treatment Plant and
Reservoir Construction ............. $ 12,000,000
(29) Wasco County Soil and Water
Conservation District -
Mosier Million #2 ...................... $ 900,000
(30) Crescent Sanitary District ........ $ 835,000
(31) City of Carlton -
Wastewater Treatment Plant ... $ 5,800,000
(32) Lane County - McKenzie River
Valley Drinking Water and
Wastewater System
Replacements............................ $ 15,500,000
(33) Panther Creek Water District
- Water Reservoir Replacement $ 1,800,000
(34) Lincoln County - Panther
Creek Septic/Stormwater .......... $ 15,000,000
(35) City of Detroit - Drinking
Water System ........................... $ 3,000,000
(36) City of Ashland - Talent-
Ashland-Phoenix (TAP)
Intertie Improvements .............. $ 3,000,000
(37) Lincoln County -
Well Repair ............................... $ 500,000
(38) City of Gates - Water Meter
Replacement.............................. $ 25,000
(39) City of Phoenix - Charlotte
Ann Water District Disbanding
Transition Costs ........................ $ 5,000,000
(40) City of Powers - Sewer
Collection System and
Sewer Plant............................... $ 3,000,000
(41) City of Roseburg -
Storm Improvements ................ $ 1,570,064
(42) Cave Junction - Water
Distribution Center ................... $ 200,000
(43) City of Mosier - Waste
Water Treatment Plan Update . $ 2,500,000
(44) City of Nyssa - Water
Expansion.................................. $ 3,000,000
(45) City of Medford - SW Medford
Water and Sewer Infrastructure $ 2,700,000
(46) City of Redmond - Skyline
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 28
Village Affordable Housing
Sewer ........................................ $ 950,000
(47) City of Corvallis - Rock
Creek Transmission Main ......... $ 10,500,000
(48) Lakeview - Water Treatment
Facility...................................... $ 15,000,000
SECTION 197.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure,  is increased by $15,000,000, for the purpose of providing grants un-
der ORS 285B.420 for levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410 from the Levee  Project Grant
Fund established by ORS 285B.421.
SECTION 198. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, for  deposit in the Special Public
Works Fund established under ORS 285B.455.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased  by $20,000,000, for the expenditure of net bond proceeds
from general obligation bonds issued for upgrades to the Salem Drinking Water System.
SECTION 200. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$50,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department from American Res-
cue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund moneys received by the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Business  Development
Department, for grants to music, cultural, and community venues and organizations that
were negatively impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic.
SECTION 201.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for Arts and Cultural Trust, is increased by the following amounts,  for the issuance
of grants from net bond proceeds from lottery bonds, for the following projects:
(1) Maxville Heritage Interpretive
Center - Preservation of
Maxville Townsite ..................... $ 750,000
(2) Artists Repertory Theatre ........ $ 2,000,000
(3) The Josephy Center for
Arts and Culture ....................... $ 600,000
(4) Eastern Oregon Regional
Theatre - Baker Orpheum
Theatre Restoration .................. $ 295,000
(5) Chehalem Cultural Center -
Performing Arts Wing .............. $ 1,250,000
(6) Siltez Tribal Arts
and Heritage Society ................. $ 750,000
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 29
(7) The Jon G. Shedd Institute
for the Arts .............................. $ 1,600,000
(8) Little Theatre on the Bay -
Liberty Theatre Expansion ....... $ 600,000
(9) Columbia River Maritime
Museum - Lightship Columbia
Preservation.............................. $ 304,378
(10) Portland Art Museum -
Rothko Pavilion......................... $ 1,000,000
SECTION 202.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $10,000,000, for  a grant program for county fair
capital improvements.
SECTION 203. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for Arts and Cultural  Trust, is increased by $361,350, for the payment of costs asso-
ciated with the issuance of lottery revenue bonds.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $1,254,312, for  the payment of costs associated with
the issuance of lottery revenue bonds.
SECTION 205. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for lottery  bond debt service, is in-
creased by $6,905,674.
SECTION 206. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$120,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of  expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department from American Res-
cue Plan Act Capital Projects Fund moneys received by the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services and deposited in the Broadband Fund established  by section 4, chapter 17,
Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
SECTION 207.
 (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by
$1,387,837, for additional staffing capacity.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5023), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from lottery
moneys allocated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund to the
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 30
Oregon Business Development Department, for  business, innovation and trade, is increased
by $480,743, for additional staffing capacity.
SECTION 208. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by  section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
business, innovation and trade, is increased by $85,845, for additional staffing capacity.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Oregon Business Development Department by section 1 (4), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for infrastructure,
is increased by $219,660, for additional staffing capacity.
SECTION 209. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $219,660, for additional staffing capacity.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5023), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
business, innovation and trade, is increased by $461,286, for additional staffing capacity.
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5023), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for
operations, is increased by $272,000, for additional staffing capacity.
SECTION 210. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the  Oregon Business Development Department, for the Oregon Film and Video Of-
fice, is increased by $112,500, for program enhancements.
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for infrastructure, is  increased by
$1,600,000, for a grant to the Port of Port Orford for a seafood hub redevelopment project.
SECTION 212. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $5,800
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for debt service.
SECTION 213.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for business, innovation and trade,  is increased by $500,000, for expenditure of moneys
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 31
in the Oregon Rural Capacity Fund established by section 6, chapter___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2345).
SECTION 214. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5023), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for business, innovation and trade, is increased by $10,000,000, for  expenditure of
moneys in the Disadvantaged  and Emerging Small Business Loan Fund established by section
14, chapter______, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2266).
SECTION 215. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund  to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business,
innovation and trade, for distribution as a grant to Oregon21, LLC for direct costs  of the
World Track and Field Championship.
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department  of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services, is decreased by $37,250,485,  for deferred mainte-
nance.
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$37,250,485 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department of Corrections from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Corrections,  for central admin-
istration and administrative services, for deferred maintenance.
SECTION 218. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police,  for patrol
services, criminal investigations, gaming enforcement and Office of the State Fire Marshal,
is decreased by $4,204,601, for vehicle purchases.
SECTION 219.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police,  for forensic
services and Chief Medical Examiner, is  decreased by $1,884,746, for vehicle and forensic
laboratory equipment purchases.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of State Police, for admin-
istrative services, agency support  and criminal justice information services, is decreased by
$77,080, for vehicle purchases.
SECTION 221. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,204,601 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 32
payment of expenses by the Department  of State Police from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Department of State Police, for the Patrol Ser-
vices and Criminal Investigations Division, for vehicle purchases.
SECTION 222. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,884,746 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Department  of State Police from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Department of State Police, for forensic ser-
vices, for vehicle and laboratory equipment purchases.
SECTION 223. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$77,080 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of State Police  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and  transferred to the Department of State Police, for agency support,
for vehicle purchases.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5005),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased
by $228,395 to administer the restorative justice grant program.
SECTION 225. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$632,735 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Liquor
Control Commission, for issuance costs of bonds issued under Article  XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution for the purpose of acquiring  land and construction of an agency warehouse
distribution center and headquarters facilities.
SECTION 226. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$27,390,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission, for costs of bond issuance and expenses associated with  distribution
center management information technology systems.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$175,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission, for issuance costs  of bonds issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution for an automated distribution center conveyor and order fulfillment system.
SECTION 228. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$7,547,093 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission, for debt service.
SECTION 229. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, for  distributions to com-
pensate landlords for unpaid rent payments pursuant to sections 12 and  13, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 278).
SECTION 230. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 33
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to award a grant to Home
Forward pursuant to section 9, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 278).
SECTION 231.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for distribution to the Nesika  Beach Ophir Water
District for the purpose of funding fire protection infrastructure.
SECTION 232.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5545), collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for technical services,  is
increased by the following amounts for paying the  following costs from the Water Supply
Development Account established in ORS 541.656:
(1) Water supply development
grants and loans described
in ORS 541.656 (2)(a) ................. $ 30,000,000
(2) Deschutes Basin Board of
Control piping project............... $ 10,000,000
(3) Bond issuance costs .................. $ 598,860
SECTION 233.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5545),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the  Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological  Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife  Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds  not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5545), collected  or received by the Water Resources Department, for technical services, is
increased by the  following amounts for paying the following costs from the Water Resources
Department Water Supply Fund established in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009:
(1) City of Newport for
remediation of the Big
Creek Dams, including design,
environmental permitting and
construction of seismically
sound replacement dam ............ $ 14,000,000
(2) Wallowa Lake Irrigation
District for rehabilitation
of the Wallowa Lake Dam ........ $ 14,000,000
(3) Bond issuance costs .................. $ 443,481
SECTION 234.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5545), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Water Resources Department, is increased by $3,514,230, for debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 34
SECTION 235. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for technical ser-
vices, is increased by $500,000, for grants for studies of the feasibility of developing  water
conservation, reuse and storage projects.
SECTION 236. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred  to the Water Resources Department, for a grant to
Umatilla County for the Ordnance regional water infrastructure project.
SECTION 237. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, for technical ser-
vices, is increased by $500,000, for a grant to Umatilla County to implement  agreements of
the Columbia River-Umatilla Solutions task force.
SECTION 238. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for the director’s
office, is increased by $500,000, for distribution to Oregon Consensus  to convene a process
to develop a framework and path for state-supported water planning and management at the
water region and/or basin level.
SECTION 239. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for the director’s
office, is increased by  $200,000, to support regional water planning and associated convenings.
SECTION 240. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the director’s
office, is increased  by $450,000, to provide facilitation, document development and staffing
support for the 2022 update of the Integrated Water Resources Strategy.
SECTION 241. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the director’s
office, is increased by $350,000, to contract for a statewide  business case assessment to ex-
amine the economic value of water to Oregon.
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for technical ser-
vices, is increased by $200,000, to support currently participating entities in the  place-based
planning program.
SECTION 243. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5545), collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for technical services,  is
increased by $500,000, for authorized expenditures of moneys deposited in the  Domestic Well
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 35
Remediation Fund established in section 3, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled  House
Bill 3092).
SECTION 244. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the director’s
office, is increased by $2,200,000, to address the department’s legal caseload backlog.
SECTION 245. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Water Resources Department  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Water Resources Department,  for place-based
planning.
SECTION 246. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to  the Water Resources Department, for deposit into
the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement  Fund established in section 2, chap-
ter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2145).
SECTION 247. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau
of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States Army
Corps of Engineers, the United States  Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Adminis-
tration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds not described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5545), collected or received by the Water Resources Department, for technical services,  is
increased by $2,100,000, for authorized expenditures of moneys deposited  in the Water Well
Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2145).
SECTION 248.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Water Resources Department, for assistance to
local governments with meeting fish passage requirements for dam upgrade projects.
SECTION 249. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the  Water Resources Department, to supplement
fee-based services pending development of sustainable, long-term funding mechanisms.
SECTION 250. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$4,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Water Resources Department  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to  the Water Resources Department, for the provision
of contracted services to perform flood  methodology and inundation assessments for dams
and engineering analyses on dams.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 36
SECTION 251. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Water  Resources Department, for the purchase
and deployment of surface and ground water data collection equipment.
SECTION 252. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Water  Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Water Resources  Department, for deposit in the
Water Measurement Cost Share Program Revolving Fund established in ORS 536.021.
SECTION 253. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,283,800 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Health Authority from American  Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Oregon Health Authority, for deferred mainte-
nance and equipment replacement costs at the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 254. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt service, is in-
creased by $958,626.
SECTION 255. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$117,250 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Health
Authority, for bond issuance costs for projects at the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 256. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for health systems, health
policy and analytics, and public health, is increased by $145,714 for implementation of chapter
95, Oregon Laws 2019, by the Oregon State University College of Pharmacy.
SECTION 257. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$14,870,281 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for the transfer of the Health Insurance Marketplace from the Department of
Consumer and Business Services.
SECTION 258.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$20,253,714 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for the Behavioral Health Housing Incentive Fund, associated  bond issuance costs
and other associated bond expenses.
SECTION 259. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for health systems, health
policy and analytics, and public health, is increased by $5,000,000 for costs  associated with
the implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2086).
SECTION 260. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for health systems, health
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 37
policy and analytics, and public health, is increased by $780,457 for implementation of chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2362).
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for health systems, health
policy and  analytics, and public health, is increased by $300,000 for studying the behavioral
health structures for services provided through state agencies.
SECTION 262. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5510),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services, is decreased by  $14,870,281, for transfer of the Health Insurance
Marketplace program to the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 263. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $10,678,004, for a residential and com-
mercial fire hardening grant program.
SECTION 264. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House  Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by
$2,310,459 for the Fair Housing Enforcement Statewide Investment.
SECTION 265. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $19,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
dental rates for medical assistance programs.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 266.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Mental Health Regulatory Agency, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000 for a demographic study of  licensees and a di-
versity plan.
SECTION 267. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $55,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority or
the Department of Human Services for caseload  costs or other budget challenges that the
agency is unable to mitigate.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 268. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,000,000, to award a grant to
SquareOne Villages for a shared equity homeownership pilot project  for affordable housing
units with innovative ownership structures.
SECTION 269. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 5, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for debt
service for bond-related activities, is increased by $21,402,830.
SECTION 270. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 38
5011), as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations,  from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5011), collected or received by the Housing and  Community Services Department,
is increased by $3,490,000, for issuance costs of bonds issued  under Article XI-Q of the
Oregon Constitution for the development of  affordable housing for low income households
and permanent supportive housing.
SECTION 271. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations,  from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5011), collected  or received by the Housing and Community Services Department,
is increased by $2,037,700, for payment of expenses related to the development of  affordable
housing for low income households and permanent supportive housing developed with pro-
ceeds from bonds issued under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 272.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  is in-
creased by $1,600,000 for supportive  services and rental assistance payments for permanent
supportive housing  developed with proceeds from bonds issued under Article XI-Q of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 273. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, for  funding for loans to
purchasers of naturally occurring affordable housing stock or land  upon which affordable
housing will be developed.
SECTION 274. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is in-
creased by  $100,000,000 to provide financial assistance to aid in the acquisition, renovation
or maintenance of properties with project-based federal rental assistance  contracts, public
housing undergoing significant recapitalization or publicly  supported housing as defined in
ORS 456.250, or to preserve the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
SECTION 275. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for one  or more grants to
nonprofit organizations for the purposes of developing or improving infrastructure for a
manufactured dwelling park in Springfield, Oregon.
SECTION 276.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled House Bill 5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is in-
creased by $225,953 for incorporation of regional housing needs analyses  into state and local
housing and land use planning.
SECTION 277. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for operations,  from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract services, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 39
House Bill 5011), collected  or received by the Housing and Community Services Department,
is increased by $4,500,000 for expenditures from the Long-Term Rent Assistance Fund in  ac-
cordance with chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2163).
SECTION 278. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,383,496 for housing development,
construction, infrastructure, rebuilding,  down payment assistance, loans and services asso-
ciated with wildfire recovery.
SECTION 279. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$50,780,071 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department,  for operations,
land acquisition and interim housing supply assets acquired in association with wildfire re-
covery efforts.
SECTION 280.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount estab-
lished by section 3,  chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5011), as the maxi-
mum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund to the Housing and Community  Services Department
for lottery bonds, is increased by $2,189,980, for debt service on lottery bonds.
SECTION 281. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the Oregon Essential Workforce Health  Care Program established by section 1, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 800).
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 282.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for emergency
management, is  increased by $20,000,000 for matching funds for the Federal Emergency
Management Agency’s Hazard Mitigation Grant Program.
SECTION 283. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1  (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for Administrative Ser-
vices, Agency Support and Criminal Justice Information Services,  is increased by $2,789,991
for the LEDS 20/20 Phase 6 - Sex Offender Registry project.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1  (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for Patrol Services,
Criminal Investigations, Gaming Enforcement and Office of the State  Fire Marshal, is in-
creased by $5,000 for  the Drakes Crossing Rural Fire Protection District, for matching funds
for a Federal Emergency Management Agency grant.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5504),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Aviation, for operations, is increased by $230,181, for revenue from the two-cent increase  on
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 40
aviation fuel tax established by chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2434),
which funds the aviation system action program.
SECTION 286. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5504), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Department of
Aviation, for the  aviation system action program, is increased by $4,373,444, for revenue from
the two-cent increase on aviation fuel tax established  by chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2434), which funds the aviation system action program.
SECTION 287. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $25,000,000, for the creation of an emerging
opportunities program to provide funding assistance to entities for projects targeted at ena-
bling private investment in Oregon.
SECTION 288.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5542), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service, is increased by $328,752.
SECTION 289. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$300,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Health Authority from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Oregon Health Authority, for operations and
health-related services at the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 290. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for the Oregon State
Hospital, is decreased by $300,000,000.
SECTION 291. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$800,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and  transferred to the Department of Corrections, for operations and
health services.
SECTION 292. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for operations and health
services, is decreased by $800,000,000.
SECTION 293. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$100,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Youth Authority  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Youth Authority, for facility programs.
SECTION 294. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for facility  programs, is
decreased by $100,000,000.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 6 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 41
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds and funds described in sections 8 to 12,  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Bill 5528), collected or received by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, for programs and related grants is increased  by $10,000,000 for pay-
ments out of the Oregon Conservation  Corps Fund established by section 23, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 762).
SECTION 296.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medi-
care receipts and including federal funds  for indirect cost recovery, Social Security Supple-
mental Security Income recoveries and the Child  Care and Development Fund, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5529), collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for
shared services, is increased by $628,913 for the purpose of carrying out section 3,  chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 749).
SECTION 297.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  State Forestry Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for private forests,
is increased by $686,300  for costs associated with the establishment of positions related to
administration of the Oregon Forest Practices Act.
SECTION 298. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and includ-
ing federal funds from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State Forestry
Department, for private forests, is increased by $457,530, for costs associated with the  es-
tablishment of positions related to administration of the Oregon Forest Practices Act.
SECTION 299. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for the following agen-
cies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5501 1 -$16,340
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(1) -41,343
Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 42
General Fund HB 5002 1(7) -600,308
Chief Financial Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(2) -57,772
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds HB 5002 2(3) -144,309
Chief Human Resource Office
Other funds HB 5002 2(4) -124,310
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds HB 5002 2(5)(a) -877,634
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds HB 5002 2(6) -65,117
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(7) -1,776,395
Business Services
Other funds HB 5002 2(8) -1,554,348
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds HB 5002 2(12) -2,695,360
ODAS Information Technology
Other funds HB 5002 2(14) +110,879
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds HB 5002 3 -8,932,386
State Treasury:
Administrative Services
Other funds SB 5544 1(1) -271,372
Investment Services
Other funds SB 5544 1(3) -196,552
Public Savings Services
Other funds SB 5544 1(4) -62,640
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds SB 5544 1(5) -90,669
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5033 1 -40,195
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds SB 5536 1(1) -210,200
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds SB 5536 1(2) -3,306,098
Information Services
Division
Other funds SB 5536 1(3) +7,730
Operations Division
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 43
Other funds SB 5536 1(4) -11,469
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds SB 5536 1(5) -68,410
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5538 1(1) +20,067
Other funds SB 5538 2(1) -106,645
Elections Division
General Fund SB 5538 1(2) -211,220
Other funds SB 5538 2(2) -34
Federal funds SB 5538 3 -6,971
Archives Division
Other funds SB 5538 2(4) -164,264
Audits Division
Other funds SB 5538 2(3) -126,229
Corporation Division
Other funds SB 5538 2(5) -155,311
Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds HB 5018 1(1) -514,975
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds HB 5018 1(2) -39,720
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds HB 5018 1(3) -3,722
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund SB 5537 1(1) -1,197,563
Other funds SB 5537 2(1) -325,197
Property Tax Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(2) -117,395
Other funds SB 5537 2(2) -5,616
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(3) -419,665
Other funds SB 5537 2(3) -14,434
Business Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(4) -158,912
Other funds SB 5537 2(4) -58,963
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(6) +40,422
Other funds SB 5537 2(7) +10,298
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5537 1(7) -789,000
Other funds SB 5537 2(10) +790,000
Collections Division
General Fund SB 5537 1(5) -69,688
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 44
Other funds SB 5537 2(5) -40,049
Marijuana Division
Other funds SB 5537 2(8) -22,802
Corporate Division
Other funds SB 5537 2(6) -20,201
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds SB 5537 2(9) -9,469
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5008 1 -77,831
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds HB 5008 3 -51,846
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5520 1 -476,684
Other funds SB 5520 4 -92,512
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds SB 5520 3 -72,430
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5519 1 -92,004
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5017 1 -70,697
Operating Expenses
- Non-Assessments
Other funds HB 5017 2 -96,767
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds HB 5017 3 -120,049
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5001 1 -$88,512
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5540 1 -69,152
Construction Contractors
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 45
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5509 1 -186,817
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds SB 5523 1 -94,751
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds SB 5523 2 -50,980
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5507 1 -79,230
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5532 1 -86,002
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5511 1 -23,039
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds SB 5521 1 -54,881
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds SB 5521 2 -31,572
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds SB 5521 3 -14,198
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds SB 5521 4 -30,351
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds SB 5521 5 -26,641
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds SB 5521 6 -31,762
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5015 1 -159,929
Other funds HB 5015 2 -114,658
Federal funds HB 5015 4 -14,786
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 46
Other funds HB 5015 3(1) -27,629
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds HB 5032 1(1) -215,242
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds HB 5032 1(2) -13,440
Administration
Other funds HB 5032 1(3) -142,891
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds HB 5032 1(4) -11,713
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds SB 5510 1(1) -107,415
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds SB 5510 1(2) -432,712
Oregon OSHA
Other funds SB 5510 1(3) -503,718
Central Services Division
Other funds SB 5510 1(5) -329,020
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds SB 5510 1(6) -408,386
Federal funds SB 5510 2(5) -157
Building Codes Division
Other funds SB 5510 1(7) -256,616
Health Insurance Exchange
- Marketplace Division
Other funds SB 5510 1(4) -54,625
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5034 1 -66,208
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5022 1 -123,016
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5021 1 -84,573
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5027 1 -65,797
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2021
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 47
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund HB 5023 1(1) -$16,035
Business, Innovation and
Trade
General Fund HB 5023 1(2) -782
Other funds HB 5023 2(1) -65,118
Lottery funds HB 5023 3(1) -136,172
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5023 1(3) -2,503,158
Infrastructure
Other funds HB 5023 2(2) -78,567
Lottery funds HB 5023 3(5) -14,229
Federal funds HB 5023 4(2) -1,674
Operations
Other funds HB 5023 2(3) -1,015
Lottery funds HB 5023 3(2) -105,280
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds HB 5023 2(4) -11,817
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5023 3(4) -10,895,472
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5011 1 -3,465
Other funds HB 5011 2 -793,556
Federal funds HB 5011 4 -79,166
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5011 5 -2,321,470
Other funds HB 5011 6 +33,240
Lottery funds HB 5011 3 -7,234,990
Non-limited
Other funds HB 5011 7(3) -7,709
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
General Fund HB 5036 1(1) -80,837
Lottery funds HB 5036 2(1) -51,774
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5036 2(4) -690,010
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds HB 5036 3(1) -238,862
Employment Department:
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 48
General Fund HB 5007 1(2) -3,991
Other funds HB 5007 2(3) -64,681
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds HB 5007 2(1) -838,693
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds HB 5007 2(2) -150,666
Modernization Initiative
Other funds HB 5007 2(4) -243,749
Operating Budget
Federal funds HB 5007 5 -1,444,089
(4) EDUCATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5035 1 -$242,855
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund SB 5513 1(1) -3,479,423
Other funds SB 5513 5(2) -633,614
Federal funds SB 5513 7(1) -367,455
Article XI-P General
Obligation Bonds Debt
Service
General Fund SB 5513 4 -1,956,319
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs and grants
General Fund SB 5528 1(1) -494,020
Other funds SB 5528 6(1) -36,918
Federal funds SB 5528 7 -59,193
Debt Service
Community Colleges
General Fund SB 5528
1(10)(b) -2,677,692
Debt Service
Public Universities
General Fund SB 5528
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 49
1(10)(a) -7,461,057
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds SB 5528 2 -4,654,468
Lottery Debt Service
- From Administrative
Services Economic
Development Fund
for Community Colleges
Lottery funds SB 5528 3 -1,545,583
Debt Service - Lottery,
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
Other funds SB 5528 6(3) +1,939,485
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund HB 5019 1(1) -$33,561
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund HB 5019 1(2) -21,043
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5019 2 -5,302
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5003 1 -33,596
Other funds HB 5003 2 -11,532
Federal funds HB 5003 3 -162,344
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5029 1 -53,732
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services
General Fund SB 5529 1(1) -106,286
Other funds SB 5529 2(1) -14,795
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 50
Federal funds SB 5529 3(1) -125,763
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund SB 5529 1(2) -12,893,756
Other funds SB 5529 2(2) -535,624
Federal funds SB 5529 3(2) -7,349,430
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund SB 5529 1(3) -196,634
Other funds SB 5529 2(3) -1,357
Federal funds SB 5529 3(3) -98,911
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund SB 5529 1(4) -8,608
Other funds SB 5529 2(4) -755
Federal funds SB 5529 3(4) -41,538
Child Welfare
General Fund SB 5529 1(5) -3,722,564
Other funds SB 5529 2(5) -11,692
Federal funds SB 5529 3(5) -2,375,227
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund SB 5529 1(6) -235,189
Other funds SB 5529 2(6) -16,108
Federal funds SB 5529 3(6) -286,767
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund SB 5529 1(7) -20,235
Other funds SB 5529 2(7) -42
Federal funds SB 5529 3(7) -37,821
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5529 1(8) -1,406,985
Other funds SB 5529 2(9) +1,112,515
Shared Services
Other funds SB 5529 2(8) -156,595
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health
General Fund HB 5024 1(1) -272,508
Other funds HB 5024 2(1) -311,188
Lottery funds HB 5024 3(1) -97
Federal funds HB 5024 5(1) -311,692
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund HB 5024 1(2) -166,598
Other funds HB 5024 2(2) -36,811
Federal funds HB 5024 5(2) -62
Central Services, State
Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund HB 5024 1(3) -12,869,243
Other funds HB 5024 2(3) -1,981,320
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 51
Federal funds HB 5024 5(3) -3,396,960
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds HB 5024 2(4) -39,051
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Fit and Disability
Commission:
Administration
General Fund HB 5013 1(1) -$16,357
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund HB 5012 1(2) -2,426,205
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5012 1(5) -5,111,991
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5030 1(8) -190,407
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund HB 5016 1(1) -$204,324
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5016 1(2) -3,308,287
Other funds HB 5016 2(2) +627,060
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund HB 5016 6 -262,700
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 11 -130,806
Legislative Fiscal
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 52
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 14(1) -7,562
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 16 -5,636
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 17 -28,888
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5016 15 -35,929
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds HB 5020 1(1) -$90,157
State Department of Energy:
Operations
Other funds SB 5515 2 -269,199
Federal funds SB 5515 4 -561
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
General Fund HB 5010 1 +23,848
Geologic Survey
Other funds HB 5010 2(1) -4,024
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds HB 5010 2(2) -2,670
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Other funds HB 5025 2(1) -5,297
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(1) -5,045
Central Services
Other funds HB 5025 2(2) -934,468
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(2) -889,953
Direct Services
Other funds HB 5025 2(4) -169,981
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 53
Lottery funds HB 5025 3(4) -161,884
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5025 4 -864,620
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund SB 5531 1 +20,325
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund SB 5545 1(1) -312,386
Other funds SB 5545 3(1) -3,416
Field Services
General Fund SB 5545 1(2) -53,394
Other funds SB 5545 3(2) -18,248
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund SB 5545 1(3) -14,033
Other funds SB 5545 3(3) -23,674
Technical Services
General Fund SB 5545 1(4) -12,335
Other funds SB 5545 3(4) -11,108
Director’s Office
General Fund SB 5545 1(5) -49,829
Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5545 2 -7,485,210
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operating Expenses,
Activities and Projects
Lottery funds HB 5037 5 -81,602
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund Programs
Other funds SB 5539 1(1) -781,005
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds SB 5539 1(3) -453
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund SB 5502 1(1) -10,120
Other funds SB 5502 2(1) -32,221
Food Safety
General Fund SB 5502 1(2) -99,522
Other funds SB 5502 2(2) -201,523
Federal funds SB 5502 4(2) -5,700
Natural Resources
General Fund SB 5502 1(3) -50,185
Other funds SB 5502 2(3) -188,772
Federal funds SB 5502 4(3) -28,785
Market Access
General Fund SB 5502 1(4) -39,189
Other funds SB 5502 2(4) -154,513
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 54
Federal funds SB 5502 4(4) -24,874
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds SB 5502 3 -75,930
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund SB 5516 1(1) -21,043
Other funds SB 5516 2(1) -363,227
Federal funds SB 5516 5(1) -3,361
Water Quality
General Fund SB 5516 1(2) -25,425
Other funds SB 5516 2(2) -98,503
Federal funds SB 5516 5(2) -287,782
Land Quality
Other funds SB 5516 2(3) -400,443
Federal funds SB 5516 5(3) -3,685
Agency Management
Other funds SB 5516 2(4) -1,250,464
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds SB 5516 3 -6,402
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(1) -69
Other funds HB 5009 2(1) -446,546
Lottery funds HB 5009 3(1) -30
Federal funds HB 5009 4(1) -121
Wildlife Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(2) -349
Other funds HB 5009 2(2) -255,794
Lottery funds HB 5009 3(2) -58
Federal funds HB 5009 4(2) -1,843
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund HB 5009 1(3) -41,537
Other funds HB 5009 2(3) -2,078,639
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds SB 5518 2(1) -1,559,761
Federal funds SB 5518 4(1) -1,138
Fire Protection
General Fund SB 5518 1(2) -699,452
Other funds SB 5518 2(2) -100,353
Federal funds SB 5518 4(2) -62,451
Private Forests
General Fund SB 5518 1(4) -167,457
Other funds SB 5518 2(5) -15,136
Federal funds SB 5518 4(5) -11,788
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5518 1(5) -2,059
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 55
Other funds SB 5518 2(7) +2,060
State Forests
Other funds SB 5518 2(3) -107,181
Federal funds SB 5518 4(3) -875
Federal Forest Restoration
General Fund SB 5518 1(3) -18,249
Equipment Pool
Other funds SB 5518 2(8) -29,419
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds SB 5518 2(9) -1,785
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Planning Program
General Fund SB 5530 1(1) -170,597
Other funds SB 5530 2 -2,493
Federal funds SB 5530 3 -48,580
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5508 1 -1,251
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund HB 5026 1 -$133,859
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal
General Fund HB 5028 1(1) -1,764,766
Other funds HB 5028 2(1) -604,732
Federal funds HB 5028 3(1) -17,855
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund HB 5028 1(2) -180,468
Other funds HB 5028 2(2) -240,393
Federal funds HB 5028 3(2) -2,319
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund HB 5028 1(3) -174,006
Other funds HB 5028 2(3) -434
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 56
Federal funds HB 5028 3(3) -812
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund HB 5028 1(4) -483,686
Other funds HB 5028 2(4) -68,454
Federal funds HB 5028 3(4) -19,753
Department of Corrections:
Operations and Health
Services
Other funds HB 5004 2(1) -463,297
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5004 1(2) -11,413,687
Other funds HB 5004 2(2) -280,760
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5004 1(5) -1,344,623
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund HB 5005 1 -117,953
Other funds HB 5005 3 -531
Federal funds HB 5005 4 -133
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund SB 5512 1 -223,358
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund HB 5014 1(1) -2,553
Other funds HB 5014 2(1) -166,372
Appellate Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(2) -22,375
Other funds HB 5014 2(2) -62,550
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(3) -67,301
Other funds HB 5014 2(4) -112,150
Federal funds HB 5014 3(2) -304
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund HB 5014 1(4) -25,051
Other funds HB 5014 2(5) -81,464
Federal funds HB 5014 3(3) -50,134
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund HB 5014 1(5) -1,906,462
Division of Child Support
General Fund HB 5014 1(6) -294,558
Other funds HB 5014 2(8) -155,495
Federal funds HB 5014 3(4) -811,203
Civil Enforcement Division
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 57
Other funds HB 5014 2(3) -1,058,659
Federal funds HB 5014 3(1) -25,480
General Counsel Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(6) -242,529
Trial Division
Other funds HB 5014 2(7) -272,137
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund SB 5535 1(1) -419,147
Other funds SB 5535 2(1) -3,320
Operations
General Fund SB 5535 1(2) -152,755
Other funds SB 5535 2(2) -10,541
Federal funds SB 5535 3(1) -679,018
Emergency Management
General Fund SB 5535 1(3) -446,105
Other funds SB 5535 2(3) -117,652
Federal funds SB 5535 3(2) -10,391
Community Support
General Fund SB 5535 1(4) -5,875
Other funds SB 5535 2(4) -13,787
Federal funds SB 5535 3(3) -37,944
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5535 1(5) -270,250
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds HB 5031 2(1) -410,560
Federal funds HB 5031 3 -2,797
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund HB 5039 1(1) -155,820
Community Programs
General Fund HB 5039 1(2) -159,342
Federal funds HB 5039 3(1) -32,267
Program Support
General Fund HB 5039 1(3) -2,788,587
Federal funds HB 5039 3(2) -97,549
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5039 1(6) -4,808,726
Other funds HB 5039 2(4) +1,137,980
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 58
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds SB 5504 1(1) -$31,667
Department of
Transportation:
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5542 1 -547
Other funds SB 5542 2(18) +550
Lottery funds SB 5542 4 -3,539,712
Maintenance and Emergency
Relief Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(2) -4,932,261
Preservation Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(3) -998
Bridge Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(4) -3,137
Operations Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(5) -20,692
Modernization Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(6) -40,581
Special Programs
Other funds SB 5542 2(7) -664,181
Local Government Program
Other funds SB 5542 2(8) -807
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds SB 5542 2(9) -367,454
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds SB 5542 2(10) -16,288
Policy, Data and Analysis
Other funds SB 5542 2(11) -19,610
Federal funds SB 5542 3(3) -326
Public Transit
Other funds SB 5542 2(12) -197
Rail
Other funds SB 5542 2(13) -60,120
Federal funds SB 5542 3(5) -72,556
Transportation Safety
Other funds SB 5542 2(14) -521
Federal funds SB 5542 3(6) -195
Support Services
Other funds SB 5542 2(15) -3,221,439
Headquarters
Other funds SB 5542 2(16) -9,018
Finance and Budget
Other funds SB 5542 2(17) -1,760,106
SECTION 300. This 2021 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 59
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5006 (HB 5006-A) Page 60